Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2122
Real property; eminent domain; effect of resolution.

An authority shall have the right to acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any real property which it may deem necessary for a redevelopment project or for its purposes under the Community Development Law after the adoption by it of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the real property described therein is necessary for such purposes. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

When an authority has found and determined by resolution that certain real property described therein is necessary for a redevelopment project or for its purposes under the Community Development Law, the resolution shall be conclusive evidence that the acquisition of such real property is necessary for the purposes described therein.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 8, p. 810;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1622;

Laws 1961, c. 61, § 11, p. 237;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2622;

Laws 2018, LB874, § 20.

The taking of substandard or blighted areas by a city for redevelopment and resale in accordance with an approved redevelopment plan which is in conformity with a general plan for the municipality as a whole as provided for in these sections, is a proper public use for a municipality. Monarch Chemical Works, Inc. v. City of Omaha, 203 Neb. 33, 277 N.W.2d 423 (1979).